Utah statutes.
59-2-1009.   Equalization based on reports of county auditors.

Before July 7 the commission shall examine and compare the reports of the county auditors and shall equalize the assessment of the taxable property of the several counties of the state for the purpose of taxation.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 3, 1988 General Session

